Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:An inmate being housed in a correctional facility shall not be assigned to share a room or cell with any other person of a different biological sex than that of the inmate if the inmate has a history of sexual or physical violence against a victim whose biological sex is the same as the other person assigned to the room or cell.For purposes of this section, "a history of sexual or physical violence" means one or more current charges or prior convictions for a sex offense, violent offense, or an offense that constitutes domestic violence as those terms are defined in RCW 9.94A.030.--- END ---